District of Columbia statutes.
44-1051.12

Verification of credentials of aides.

Before initially providing or referring a Home Health Aide or a Personal Care Aide to a health care facility or agency, or to an individual, for the purpose of rendering temporary home health or personal care services within the District of Columbia, a nurse staffing agency shall verify and document that the individual Home Health Aide or Personal Care Aide provided or referred has received the necessary education and training for that position, as required by law.

March 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-74, § 12, 50 DCR 10914